Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,180
Terms, defined.

As used in sections 25-224 and 25-21,180 to 25-21,182, unless the context otherwise requires: Product liability action shall mean any action brought against a manufacturer, seller, or lessor of a product, regardless of the substantive legal theory or theories upon which the action is brought, for or on account of personal injury, death, or property damage caused by or resulting from the manufacture, construction, design, formulation, installation, preparation, assembly, testing, packaging, or labeling of any product, or the failure to warn or protect against a danger or hazard in the use, misuse, or intended use of any product, or the failure to provide proper instructions for the use of any product.

Laws 1978, LB 665, § 1;

Laws 1998, LB 234, § 8.

In defining a product liability action as an action brought for or on account of personal injury, death, or property damage caused by a product, this section refers only to physical harm, not to economic loss. National Crane Corp. v. Ohio Steel Tube Co., 213 Neb. 782, 332 N.W.2d 39 (1983).